Illinois, session 104th, HB2415.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/4)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)8    Sec. 4. License requirement; application; notice. 9    (a) Any person, group of persons or corporation who or 10which receives children or arranges for care or placement of 11one or more children unrelated to the operator must apply for a 12license to operate one of the types of facilities defined in 13Sections 2.05 through 2.19 and in Section 2.22 of this Act. Any 14relative, as defined in Section 2.17 of this Act, who receives 15a child or children for placement by the Department on a 16full-time basis may apply for a license to operate a foster 17family home as defined in Section 2.17 of this Act.18    (a-5) Any agency, person, group of persons, association, 19organization, corporation, institution, center, or group 20providing adoption services must be licensed by the Department 21as a child welfare agency as defined in Section 2.08 of this 22Act. "Providing adoption services", as used in this Act, 23includes facilitating or engaging in adoption services.   HB2415- 2 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1    (b) Application for a license to operate a child care 2facility must be made to the Department in the manner and on 3forms prescribed by it. An application to operate a foster 4family home shall include, at a minimum: a completed written 5form; written authorization by the applicant and all adult 6members of the applicant's household to conduct a criminal 7background investigation; medical evidence in the form of a 8medical report, on forms prescribed by the Department, that 9the applicant and all members of the household are free from 10communicable diseases or physical and mental conditions that 11affect their ability to provide care for the child or 12children; the names and addresses of at least 3 persons not 13related to the applicant who can attest to the applicant's 14moral character; the name and address of at least one relative 15who can attest to the applicant's capability to care for the 16child or children; and fingerprints submitted by the applicant 17and all adult members of the applicant's household.18    (b-5) Prior to submitting an application for a foster 19family home license, a quality of care concerns applicant as 20defined in Section 2.22a of this Act must submit a preliminary 21application to the Department in the manner and on forms 22prescribed by it. The Department shall explain to the quality 23of care concerns applicant the grounds for requiring a 24preliminary application. The preliminary application shall 25include a list of (i) all children placed in the home by the 26Department who were removed by the Department for reasons   HB2415- 3 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1other than returning to a parent and the circumstances under 2which they were removed and (ii) all children placed by the 3Department who were subsequently adopted by or placed in the 4private guardianship of the quality of care concerns applicant 5who are currently under 18 and who no longer reside in the home 6and the reasons why they no longer reside in the home. The 7preliminary application shall also include, if the quality of 8care concerns applicant chooses to submit, (1) a response to 9the quality of care concerns, including any reason the 10concerns are invalid, have been addressed or ameliorated, or 11no longer apply and (2) affirmative documentation 12demonstrating that the quality of care concerns applicant's 13home does not pose a risk to children and that the family will 14be able to meet the physical and emotional needs of children. 15The Department shall verify the information in the preliminary 16application and review (i) information regarding any prior 17licensing complaints, (ii) information regarding any prior 18child abuse or neglect investigations, (iii) information 19regarding any involuntary foster home holds placed on the home 20by the Department, and (iv) information regarding all child 21exit interviews, as provided in Section 5.26 of the Children 22and Family Services Act, regarding the home. Foster home 23applicants with quality of care concerns are presumed 24unsuitable for future licensure.25    Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (b-5), 26the Department may make an exception and issue a foster family   HB2415- 4 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1license to a quality of care concerns applicant if the 2Department is satisfied that the foster family home does not 3pose a risk to children and that the foster family will be able 4to meet the physical and emotional needs of children. In 5making this determination, the Department must obtain and 6carefully review all relevant documents and shall obtain 7consultation from its Clinical Division as appropriate and as 8prescribed by Department rule and procedure. The Department 9has the authority to deny a preliminary application based on 10the record of quality of care concerns of the foster family 11home. In the alternative, the Department may (i) approve the 12preliminary application, (ii) approve the preliminary 13application subject to obtaining additional information or 14assessments, or (iii) approve the preliminary application for 15purposes of placing a particular child or children only in the 16foster family home. If the Department approves a preliminary 17application, the foster family shall submit an application for 18licensure as described in subsection (b) of this Section. The 19Department shall notify the quality of care concerns applicant 20of its decision and the basis for its decision in writing.21    (c) The Department shall notify the public when a child 22care institution, maternity center, or group home licensed by 23the Department undergoes a change in (i) the range of care or 24services offered at the facility or (ii) the type of children 25served. The Department shall notify the public of the change 26in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or   HB2415- 5 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1municipality in which the applicant's facility is or is 2proposed to be located.3    (c-5) When a child care institution, maternity center, or 4a group home licensed by the Department undergoes a change in 5(i) the age of children served or (ii) the area within the 6facility used by children, the Department shall post 7information regarding proposed changes on its website as 8required by rule. 9    (d) If, upon examination of the facility and investigation 10of persons responsible for care of children and, in the case of 11a foster home, taking into account information obtained for 12purposes of evaluating a preliminary application, if 13applicable, the Department is satisfied that the facility and 14responsible persons reasonably meet standards prescribed for 15the type of facility for which application is made, it shall 16issue a license in proper form, designating on that license 17the type of child care facility and, except for a child welfare 18agency, the number of children to be served at any one time.19    (e) The Department shall not issue or renew the license of 20any child welfare agency providing adoption services, unless 21the agency (i) is officially recognized by the United States 22Internal Revenue Service as a tax-exempt organization 23described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 241986 (or any successor provision of federal tax law) and (ii) 25is in compliance with all of the standards necessary to 26maintain its status as an organization described in Section   HB2415- 6 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (or any 2successor provision of federal tax law). The Department shall 3grant a grace period of 24 months from August 15, 2005 (the 4effective date of Public Act 94-586) this amendatory Act of 5the 94th General Assembly for existing child welfare agencies 6providing adoption services to obtain 501(c)(3) status. The 7Department shall permit an existing child welfare agency that 8converts from its current structure in order to be recognized 9as a 501(c)(3) organization as required by this Section to 10either retain its current license or transfer its current 11license to a newly formed entity, if the creation of a new 12entity is required in order to comply with this Section, 13provided that the child welfare agency demonstrates that it 14continues to meet all other licensing requirements and that 15the principal officers and directors and programs of the 16converted child welfare agency or newly organized child 17welfare agency are substantially the same as the original. The 18Department shall have the sole discretion to grant a one-year 19one year extension to any agency unable to obtain 501(c)(3) 20status within the timeframe specified in this subsection (e), 21provided that such agency has filed an application for 22501(c)(3) status with the Internal Revenue Service within the 232-year timeframe specified in this subsection (e). 24    (f) The Department shall adopt rules to implement the 25changes to this Section made by Public Act 103-770 this 26amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly no later than   HB2415- 7 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1January 1, 2025. 2    (g) After submitting an application for a foster family 3home license, an applicant who currently holds a valid foster 4family home license or its equivalent from another state 5without any pending violations or investigations shall be 6granted a temporary foster family home license in this State 7during the pendency of the Illinois application for a foster 8family home license. The temporary foster family home license 9shall not have an effect on the permanent license being 10granted or denied. 11(Source: P.A. 102-763, eff. 1-1-23; 103-770, eff. 1-1-25; 12revised 8-20-24.) 13    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)14    Sec. 4. License requirement; application; notice; 15Department of Children and Family Services. 16    (a) Any person, group of persons or corporation who or 17which receives children or arranges for care or placement of 18one or more children unrelated to the operator must apply for a 19license to operate one of the types of facilities defined in 20Sections 2.05 through 2.19 (other than a day care center or day 21care home) and in Section 2.22 of this Act. Any relative, as 22defined in Section 2.17 of this Act, who receives a child or 23children for placement by the Department on a full-time basis 24may apply for a license to operate a foster family home as 25defined in Section 2.17 of this Act.  HB2415- 8 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1    (a-5) Any agency, person, group of persons, association, 2organization, corporation, institution, center, or group 3providing adoption services must be licensed by the Department 4as a child welfare agency as defined in Section 2.08 of this 5Act. "Providing adoption services", as used in this Act, 6includes facilitating or engaging in adoption services. 7    (b) Application for a license to operate a child care 8facility (other than a day care center, day care home, or group 9day care home) must be made to the Department in the manner and 10on forms prescribed by it. An application to operate a foster 11family home shall include, at a minimum: a completed written 12form; written authorization by the applicant and all adult 13members of the applicant's household to conduct a criminal 14background investigation; medical evidence in the form of a 15medical report, on forms prescribed by the Department, that 16the applicant and all members of the household are free from 17communicable diseases or physical and mental conditions that 18affect their ability to provide care for the child or 19children; the names and addresses of at least 3 persons not 20related to the applicant who can attest to the applicant's 21moral character; the name and address of at least one relative 22who can attest to the applicant's capability to care for the 23child or children; and fingerprints submitted by the applicant 24and all adult members of the applicant's household.25    (b-5) Prior to submitting an application for a foster 26family home license, a quality of care concerns applicant as   HB2415- 9 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1defined in Section 2.22a of this Act must submit a preliminary 2application to the Department in the manner and on forms 3prescribed by it. The Department shall explain to the quality 4of care concerns applicant the grounds for requiring a 5preliminary application. The preliminary application shall 6include a list of (i) all children placed in the home by the 7Department who were removed by the Department for reasons 8other than returning to a parent and the circumstances under 9which they were removed and (ii) all children placed by the 10Department who were subsequently adopted by or placed in the 11private guardianship of the quality of care concerns applicant 12who are currently under 18 and who no longer reside in the home 13and the reasons why they no longer reside in the home. The 14preliminary application shall also include, if the quality of 15care concerns applicant chooses to submit, (1) a response to 16the quality of care concerns, including any reason the 17concerns are invalid, have been addressed or ameliorated, or 18no longer apply and (2) affirmative documentation 19demonstrating that the quality of care concerns applicant's 20home does not pose a risk to children and that the family will 21be able to meet the physical and emotional needs of children. 22The Department shall verify the information in the preliminary 23application and review (i) information regarding any prior 24licensing complaints, (ii) information regarding any prior 25child abuse or neglect investigations, (iii) information 26regarding any involuntary foster home holds placed on the home   HB2415- 10 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1by the Department, and (iv) information regarding all child 2exit interviews, as provided in Section 5.26 of the Children 3and Family Services Act, regarding the home. Foster home 4applicants with quality of care concerns are presumed 5unsuitable for future licensure.6    Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (b-5), 7the Department may make an exception and issue a foster family 8license to a quality of care concerns applicant if the 9Department is satisfied that the foster family home does not 10pose a risk to children and that the foster family will be able 11to meet the physical and emotional needs of children. In 12making this determination, the Department must obtain and 13carefully review all relevant documents and shall obtain 14consultation from its Clinical Division as appropriate and as 15prescribed by Department rule and procedure. The Department 16has the authority to deny a preliminary application based on 17the record of quality of care concerns of the foster family 18home. In the alternative, the Department may (i) approve the 19preliminary application, (ii) approve the preliminary 20application subject to obtaining additional information or 21assessments, or (iii) approve the preliminary application for 22purposes of placing a particular child or children only in the 23foster family home. If the Department approves a preliminary 24application, the foster family shall submit an application for 25licensure as described in subsection (b) of this Section. The 26Department shall notify the quality of care concerns applicant   HB2415- 11 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1of its decision and the basis for its decision in writing.2    (c) The Department shall notify the public when a child 3care institution, maternity center, or group home licensed by 4the Department undergoes a change in (i) the range of care or 5services offered at the facility or (ii) the type of children 6served. The Department shall notify the public of the change 7in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or 8municipality in which the applicant's facility is or is 9proposed to be located.10    (c-5) When a child care institution, maternity center, or 11a group home licensed by the Department undergoes a change in 12(i) the age of children served or (ii) the area within the 13facility used by children, the Department shall post 14information regarding proposed changes on its website as 15required by rule. 16    (d) If, upon examination of the facility and investigation 17of persons responsible for care of children and, in the case of 18a foster home, taking into account information obtained for 19purposes of evaluating a preliminary application, if 20applicable, the Department is satisfied that the facility and 21responsible persons reasonably meet standards prescribed for 22the type of facility for which application is made, it shall 23issue a license in proper form, designating on that license 24the type of child care facility and, except for a child welfare 25agency, the number of children to be served at any one time.26    (e) The Department shall not issue or renew the license of   HB2415- 12 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1any child welfare agency providing adoption services, unless 2the agency (i) is officially recognized by the United States 3Internal Revenue Service as a tax-exempt organization 4described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 51986 (or any successor provision of federal tax law) and (ii) 6is in compliance with all of the standards necessary to 7maintain its status as an organization described in Section 8501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (or any 9successor provision of federal tax law). The Department shall 10grant a grace period of 24 months from August 15, 2005 (the 11effective date of Public Act 94-586) this amendatory Act of 12the 94th General Assembly for existing child welfare agencies 13providing adoption services to obtain 501(c)(3) status. The 14Department shall permit an existing child welfare agency that 15converts from its current structure in order to be recognized 16as a 501(c)(3) organization as required by this Section to 17either retain its current license or transfer its current 18license to a newly formed entity, if the creation of a new 19entity is required in order to comply with this Section, 20provided that the child welfare agency demonstrates that it 21continues to meet all other licensing requirements and that 22the principal officers and directors and programs of the 23converted child welfare agency or newly organized child 24welfare agency are substantially the same as the original. The 25Department shall have the sole discretion to grant a one-year 26one year extension to any agency unable to obtain 501(c)(3)   HB2415- 13 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1status within the timeframe specified in this subsection (e), 2provided that such agency has filed an application for 3501(c)(3) status with the Internal Revenue Service within the 42-year timeframe specified in this subsection (e). 5    (f) The Department shall adopt rules to implement the 6changes to this Section made by Public Act 103-770 this 7amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly no later than 8January 1, 2025. 9    (g) After submitting an application for a foster family 10home license, an applicant who currently holds a valid foster 11family home license or its equivalent from another state 12without any pending violations or investigations shall be 13granted a temporary foster family home license in this State 14during the pendency of the Illinois application for a foster 15family home license. The temporary foster family home license 16shall not have an effect on the permanent license being 17granted or denied. 18(Source: P.A. 102-763, eff. 1-1-23; 103-594, eff. 7-1-26; 19103-770, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 20    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 21changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 22that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 23represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 24not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 25made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other   HB2415- 14 -LRB104 03375 AAS 13397 b1Public Act.